src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.~xfst.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Compound nouns.

Tests:
  Noun - juhkkisearvi: # ACTORTVder SgNomCmp + GOAHTI-I
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkisearvi
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Pl+Nom: juhkkisearvvit
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Ill: juhkkisearvái
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkisearvváš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkisearvvážaš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [juhkkisearvveheapme, juhkkisearvviheapme]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: juhkkisearvválaš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Nom: juhkki-searvi
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Pl+Nom: juhkki-searvvit
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Ill: juhkki-searvái
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkki-searvváš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkki-searvvážaš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [juhkki-searvveheapme, juhkki-searvviheapme]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: juhkki-searvválaš

  Noun - juhkkiidsearvi: # ACTORTVder PlGenCmp + GOAHTI-I
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkiidsearvi
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Pl+Nom: juhkkiidsearvvit
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Ill: juhkkiidsearvái
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkiidsearvváš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkiidsearvvážaš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [juhkkiidsearvveheapme, juhkkiidsearvviheapme]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: juhkkiidsearvválaš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkiid-searvi
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Pl+Nom: juhkkiid-searvvit
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Sg+Ill: juhkkiid-searvái
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkiid-searvváš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juhkkiid-searvvážaš
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [juhkkiid-searvveheapme, juhkkiid-searvviheapme]
    juhkat+V+TV+Der/NomAg+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#searvi+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: juhkkiid-searvválaš
